North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-15 Canvass of Votes — Canvassing Boards
16.1-15-39.
Disagreements in canvassing returns by canvassing board — Disregarding technicalities, misspelled words, and abbreviations.

In canvassing the returns and verifying the computed final results received from the various counties, a majority of the members of the state canvassing board shall decide all matters of disagreement. The board shall disregard all technicalities, misspelling, the use of initial letters, and the abbreviations of the names of candidates if it can be ascertained from the returns for whom the votes were intended.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 2011, ch. 152, § 39.

Collateral References.

Validity of write-in vote where candidate’s surname only is written in on ballot, 86 A.L.R.2d 1025.

16.1-15-40.
Abstract prepared by state canvassing board for primary election — Contents — Signing — Candidate notified of nomination.

The state canvassing board shall prepare the certified abstract required by subsections 1, 2, and 3 of section 16.1-15-21 for primary elections. The certificate must be signed by the members of the board and filed in the office of the secretary of state. Upon completion of the canvass, the secretary of state shall mail to each candidate nominated a notice of the candidate’s nomination stating that the candidate’s name will be placed upon the official ballot to be voted for at the ensuing general election. If the election results indicate that any candidate is entitled to a recount or to demand a recount pursuant to section 16.1-16-01, the secretary of state may not prepare or deliver the notice of nomination until the time to demand a recount has expired, or the recount results have been determined and the winner declared, whichever is later. The secretary of state shall file a copy of the findings of the board and shall publish those findings in a newspaper printed in Burleigh County.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 1985, ch. 249, § 9; 1987, ch. 258, § 3; 2011, ch. 152, § 40.

16.1-15-41.
Statements of general or special election prepared by state canvassing board — Contents.

Upon receiving the certified abstracts on file with the secretary of state, the state canvassing board shall proceed publicly to examine and make statements of the whole number of votes cast at any general or special election for all state or district offices. The statements must show the names of the individuals for whom the votes were cast for the offices and the whole number of votes for each, distinguishing the several districts and counties in which they were cast.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 2011, ch. 152, § 41.

16.1-15-42.
Certificate of result of general or special election by state canvassing board — Secretary of state to receive.

The statements provided for in section 16.1-15-41 must be certified by the members of the state canvassing board who shall subscribe their names to the statements. The board then shall determine what individuals have been duly elected to the offices, shall prepare and subscribe on each statement a certificate of that determination, and shall deliver the statement to the secretary of state. The candidate to be elected for each office receiving the highest number of votes must be duly elected to the office. An individual who was entitled to have the individual’s name appear on the primary election ballot, but whose name was not placed on the primary election ballot, may not be elected to a no-party office as a write-in candidate unless the individual receives a number of votes equal to or more than the number of signatures that would have been required to have the individual’s name placed on the primary election ballot.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 2021, ch. 164, § 104, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-15-43.
When special election ordered.

If a certificate of election cannot be issued for a judicial district office or a state office because any two or more individuals have equal and the highest number of votes, the governor, by proclamation, shall order a new election.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 2005, ch. 191, § 25; 2021, ch. 164, § 105, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-15-44.
Secretary of state to record statement of general or special election, prepare certificates of election, publish abstract.

After receiving each certified statement and determination made by the state canvassing board, the secretary of state shall record the same in the secretary of state’s office and shall prepare, and transmit to each of the individuals declared to be elected, a certificate of election as provided in this chapter. If the election results indicate that any candidate is entitled to a recount or to demand a recount pursuant to section 16.1-16-01, the secretary of state may not prepare or deliver the certificate of election until the time to demand a recount has expired, or the recount results have been determined and the winner declared, whichever is later. The secretary of state shall cause a copy of the certified abstract and determination to be published in the official newspaper of Burleigh County.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 1985, ch. 249, § 10; 1987, ch. 258, § 4; 2011, ch. 152, § 42.

16.1-15-45.
Form of certificate of election for state officers — Signatures.

A certificate of election must be prepared by the secretary of state for each individual elected to a state or a district office. The certificate must be signed by the governor and the secretary of state, have the great seal of the state affixed, and be attested by at least one of the other members of the state canvassing board. The certificate, in substance, must be in the following form:

At an election held on was elected to the office of of this state for the term of years from (or, if to fill a vacancy, for the residue of the term ending on and until a successor is duly elected and qualified. , , , , ), Given at Bismarck on , .

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 1999, ch. 51, § 13; 2021, ch. 164, § 106, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-15-46.
Members of legislative assembly to receive certificates of election.

At the time election certificates are issued to state and district officers, the secretary of state shall issue certificates of election to all members of the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12.

16.1-15-47.
Certificate of election to member of Congress — Signing — Delivering.

The certificate of election to a member of Congress must be signed by the governor with the great seal affixed and must be countersigned by the secretary of state. The governor shall cause the certificate to be delivered to the individual elected.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 2021, ch. 164, § 107, effective August 1, 2021.

16.1-15-48.
Canvassing returns of constitutional amendment or other proposition — Certified abstract of result — Contents.

For the purpose of canvassing and ascertaining the result of the votes cast at any election upon any proposed amendment to the constitution, or any other proposition submitted to a vote of the people, the state canvassing board shall proceed to examine the abstracts received by the secretary of state from the county auditors to ascertain and determine the result. The board shall certify a statement of the whole number of votes cast for and the whole number of votes cast against an amendment or proposition, and it shall determine whether the amendment or proposition has been approved and ratified by a majority of the electors voting thereon, and a certificate of that determination must be prepared and subscribed on the statement.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12; 2011, ch. 152, § 43.

Cross-References.

Initiated and referred measures, see N.D. Const., art. III, §§ 1-9.

16.1-15-49.
Certified statement and determination of results of constitutional amendments and propositions recorded by secretary of state — Publishing.

The certified statement and determination provided for in section 16.1-15-48 must be recorded by the secretary of state. If it appears that a constitutional amendment or other proposition has been approved, ratified, or adopted, the secretary of state shall arrange for the text of the amendment or proposition and a record of the votes cast for and against it to be published in the session laws published after the next succeeding session of the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 12.